Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1263.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin FUTURE OF ADVANCED AGRICULTURAL RESEARCH IN MINNESOTA.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $20,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for land acquisition, site preparation, predesign, design, and preconstruction activities for new education, research, animal housing, equipment storage, and associated support facilities in Mower County for the Future of Advanced Agricultural Research in Minnesota (FAARM) program. This appropriation is for the initial phase of the project, and any remaining funds after completion of this phase may be used for later phases of this project, including preconstruction and construction. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin University share. new text end new text begin The appropriation in this section is intended to cover approximately two-thirds of the costs of this phase of the project. The remaining project costs must be paid from university sources. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $20,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end